Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-205
Sections, how construed.

Nothing contained in sections 42-201 to 42-205 shall invalidate any marriage settlement or contract.

Laws 1871, § 6, p. 68;

R.S.1913, § 1564;

C.S.1922, § 1513;

C.S.1929, § 42-205;

R.S.1943, § 42-205.